West Virginia, session 2025, SB331.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5A. Authorization for Department of human services to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5A-1. Department of Human Services. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 13, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16-59-2 of this code, modified by the Department of Human Services to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 26, 2024, relating to the Department of Human Services (Recovery Residence Certification and Accreditation Program, 69 CSR 15), is authorized.